Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.057

Academic credit for military training.

(1) Before December 31, 2015, each institution of higher education must adopt a policy to award academic credit for military training applicable to the student's certificate or degree requirements. The policy shall apply to any individual who is enrolled in the institution of higher education and who has successfully completed a military training course or program as part of his or her military service that is:

(a) Recommended for credit by a national higher education association that provides credit recommendations for military training courses and programs;

(b) Included in the individual's military transcript issued by any branch of the armed services; or

(c) Other documented military training or experience.

(2) Each institution of higher education must develop a procedure for receiving the necessary documentation to identify and verify the military training course or program that an individual is claiming for academic credit.

(3) Each institution of higher education must provide a copy of its policy for awarding academic credit for military training to any applicant who listed prior or present military service in his or her application. Each institution of higher education must develop and maintain a list of military training courses and programs that have qualified for academic credit.

(4) Each institution of higher education must submit its policy for awarding academic credit for military training to the prior learning assessment work group convened pursuant to RCW 28B.77.230.

[ 2014 c 186 s 1.]